Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-135
Biological parent; deceased; release of information.

If the department has information indicating that both biological parents of the adopted person are deceased, or if only one biological parent is known and information indicates that such parent is deceased, and no nonconsent form, as provided in section 43-132 or 43-143, has been filed, all information on the adopted person's original birth certificate regarding such deceased parent or parents shall be released to the adopted person notwithstanding the fact that no consent form was signed and filed by such deceased parent or parents prior to death.

Laws 1980, LB 992, § 17;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 33;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 81.